Massachusetts, session 194th, H5037.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The fifth sentence of the third paragraph of section 51 of chapter 11 of the
General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the
words “by Medicaid but except as required by federal Medicaid law, shall not seek
reimbursement from any other insurance or third party payor”.
of 1